src/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
!! Verb inflection
!  ---------------
!! The UNDEFINED language verbs inflect in persons.

LEXICON verb
+V: # ;
LEXICON verb_deskr
+V: # ;
LEXICON verb_fakt
+V: # ;
LEXICON verb_fakt.kaus
+V: # ;
LEXICON verb_frekv
+V: # ;
LEXICON verb_frekv.-refl
+V: # ;
LEXICON verb_inkoat
+V: # ;
LEXICON verb_intr
+V: # ;
LEXICON verb_kaus
+V: # ;
LEXICON verb_kontin
+V: # ;
LEXICON verb_mod
+V: # ;
LEXICON verb_mom
+V: # ;
LEXICON verb_mom.-refl.mom
+V: # ;
LEXICON verb_pass
+V: # ;
LEXICON verb_pass.refl
+V: # ;
LEXICON verb_pass.yksipers
+V: # ;
LEXICON verb_refl
+V: # ;
LEXICON verb_tr
+V: # ;
LEXICON verb_transl
+V: # ;
LEXICON verb_vaill
+V: # ;
LEXICON verb_yksipers
+V: # ;

LEXICON verb_weak_pres
+V+Sg1+Pres:n # ;
+V+Sg2+Pres:t # ;
+V+Pl1+Pres:mm{aä} # ;
+V+Pl2+Pres:tt{aä} # ;

LEXICON verb_strong_pres
+V+Sg3+Pres:{uy} # ;

LEXICON verb_3pl_pres
+V+Pl3+Pres:h # ;

LEXICON VERB_CONNEG_0

+Act+Pres+ConNeg:0 # ;


LEXICON VERB_PAST_3SG_0

+Act+Past+Sg3:0 # ;

LEXICON VERB_3SG_U

+Act+Pres+Sg3:u # ;
+Act+Pres+Sg3+Qst:uko # ;

LEXICON VERB_3SG_Y

+Act+Pres+Sg3:y # ;

LEXICON VERB_PASSIVE_H

+Act+Pres+Pl3:h # ;
+Pss+Pres:h # ;
+Pss+Pres+ConNeg:0 # ;

LEXICON VERB_PAST_PASSIVE_H

+Act+Past+Pl3:h CLITS_KI_OPT ;
+Pss+Past:h CLITS_KI_OPT ;

LEXICON VERB_IMPVPL_BACK

+Act+Imp+Pl2:kkua # ;

LEXICON VERB_IMPV

+Act+Imp+Sg2:0 # ;
+Act+Pres+ConNeg:0 # ;

LEXICON VERB_INF_MÄ

+Inf+Ill:mäh # ;
+Inf+Ine:mäššä # ;
+Inf+Ade:mällä # ;
+Inf+Abe:mättä # ;

LEXICON VERB_INF_MA

+Inf+Ill:mah # ;
+Inf+Ine:mašša # ;
+Inf+Abe:matta # ;
+Inf+Ade:malla # ;

LEXICON VERB_INF_TA

+Inf:ta # ;

LEXICON VERB_INF_TÄ

+Inf:tä # ;

!! FIXME: not sure
LEXICON VERB_INF_AS

+Ger+Ine:as’s’a # ;

LEXICON VERB_INF_A

+Inf:a # ;

!! FIXME: ger or sup or some other
LEXICON VERB_INF_EN

+Ger:en # ;

LEXICON VERB_INF_Ä

+Inf:ä # ;

LEXICON VERB_INF_Ö

+Inf:ö # ;

LEXICON VERB_INF_O

+Inf:o # ;

LEXICON VERB_INF_E

+Inf:e # ;


LEXICON VERB_PCP_TU

+Pss+PrfPrc+Pos+Sg+Nom:tu # ;
+Pss+PrfPrc+Pos+Sg+Par+Px3:tuoh # ;

LEXICON VERB_PCP_TY

+Pss+PrfPrc+Pos+Sg+Nom:ty # ;
+Pss+PrfPrc+Pos+Sg+Par+Px3:työh # ;

LEXICON VERB_PCP_TAVA

+Pss+PrfPrc+Pos+Sg+Nom:tava # ;
+Pss+PrfPrc+Pos+Sg+Tra:tavakši # ;
+Pss+PrfPrc+Pos+Sg+Par+Px3:tuoh # ;

LEXICON VERB_PCP_N

+Act+PrfPrc:n # ;
+Act+Past+Sg+ConNeg:n # ;

LEXICON VERB_PRES_BACK

+Act+Pres+Sg1:n # ;
+Act+Pres+Sg2:t # ;
+Act+Pres+Pl1:ma # ;
+Act+Pres+Pl1:mma # ;
+Act+Pres+Pl2:tta # ;
+Act+Pres+Sg2+Qst:tko # ;

LEXICON VERB_PRES_FRONT

+Act+Pres+Sg1:n # ;
+Act+Pres+Sg2:t # ;
+Act+Pres+Pl1:mä # ;
+Act+Pres+Pl1:mmä # ;
+Act+Pres+Pl2:ttä # ;

LEXICON VERB_PAST_BACK

+Act+Past+Sg1:in # ;
+Act+Past+Sg2:it # ;
+Act+Past+Pl1:ima # ;
+Act+Past+Pl1:imma # ;
+Act+Past+Pl2:itta # ;

LEXICON VERB_PAST_FRONT

+Act+Past+Sg1:in # ;
+Act+Past+Sg2:it # ;
+Act+Past+Pl1:immä # ;
+Act+Past+Pl2:ittä # ;


LEXICON VERB_COND

+Act+Cond+Sg1:isin # ;
+Act+Cond+Sg2:isin # ;
+Act+Cond+Sg3:is # ;
+Act+Cond+Sg3+Qst:isko # ;

LEXICON VERB_COND_PASSIVE_TAIS

+Pss+Cond+Pe4:tais # ;

LEXICON VERB_COND_PASSIVE_TÄIS

+Pss+Cond+Pe4:täis # ;


LEXICON AUX_PCP

!! FIXME
%<pp%>:t # ;
%<pp%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:n # ;

LEXICON AUX_3SG_PI

%<actv%>%<pri%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:pi # ;

LEXICON AUX_3SG_0

%<actv%>%<pri%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:0 # ;

LEXICON AUX_3SG_Y

%<actv%>%<pri%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:y # ;


LEXICON AUX_CONNEG_0

%<actv%>%<pri%>%<conneg%>:0 # ;

LEXICON AUX_PRES_FRONT

%<actv%>%<pri%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:n # ;
%<actv%>%<pri%>%<p2%>%<sg%>:t # ;
%<actv%>%<pri%>%<p1%>%<pl%>:mmä # ;
%<actv%>%<pri%>%<p2%>%<pl%>:ttä # ;

LEXICON AUX_PRES_BACK

%<actv%>%<pri%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:n # ;
%<actv%>%<pri%>%<p2%>%<sg%>:t # ;
%<actv%>%<pri%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<qst%>:tko # ;
%<actv%>%<pri%>%<p1%>%<pl%>:mma # ;
%<actv%>%<pri%>%<p2%>%<pl%>:tta # ;

!!!LEXICON AUX_PAST_WEAK_FRONT
!!!
!!!%<actv%>%<pri%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:in # ;
!!!%<actv%>%<pri%>%<p2%>%<sg%>:it # ;
!!!%<npgi%>%<cev%>%<c1%>%<cy%>:vzzä # ;
!!!%<actv%>%<pri%>%<p2%>%<pl%>:ittä # ;

LEXICON AUX_PAST_WEAK_BACK

%<actv%>%<pri%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:in # ;
%<actv%>%<pri%>%<p2%>%<sg%>:it # ;
%<actv%>%<pri%>%<p1%>%<pl%>:imma # ;
%<actv%>%<pri%>%<p2%>%<pl%>:itta # ;

LEXICON AUX_PAST_3SG_0

%<actv%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:0 # ;

LEXICON AUX_PASSIVE_H

%<actv%>%<pri%>%<p3%>%<pl%>:h # ;
%<pasv%>%<pri%>:h # ;

LEXICON AUX_PAST_PASSIVE_H

%<actv%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<pl%>:h # ;
%<pasv%>%<past%>:h # ;

LEXICON AUX_COND

%<actv%>%<cni%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:isin # ;
%<actv%>%<cni%>%<p2%>%<sg%>:isit # ;
%<actv%>%<cni%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:is # ;
%<actv%>%<cni%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<qst%>:isko # ;

LEXICON AUX_INF_A

%<inf%>:a  # ;

LEXICON AUX_INF_Ä

%<inf%>:ä  # ;

LEXICON AUX_INF_E

%<inf%>%<ine%>:ešša  # ;
%<inf%>%<ine%>%<px3sp%>:eššah  # ;

LEXICON AUX_INF_MA

%<inf%>%<ill%>:mah # ;
%<inf%>%<ine%>:mašša # ;
%<inf%>%<abe%>:matta # ;

LEXICON AUX_INF_MÄ

%<inf%>%<ill%>:mäh # ;
%<inf%>%<ine%>:maššä # ;
%<inf%>%<abe%>:mättä # ;

!LEXICON AUX_IMPV
!
!%<actv%>%<imp%>%<p2%>%<sg%>:0 # ;
!%<actv%>%<pri%>%<conneg%>:0 # ;

LEXICON AUX_PCP_TY

%<pasv%>%<pp%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:ty # ;
%<pasv%>%<pp%>%<sg%>%<par%>%<px3sp%>:työh # ;


LEXICON AUX_PCP_N

%<actv%>%<pp%>:n # ;
%<actv%>%<past%>%<sg%>%<conneg%>:n # ;



! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
