src/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON Verbs
ahavoija	verb_intr ;
alkuo	verb_intr ;
ampuo	verb_tr ;
ampuo	verb_intr ;
eleä	verb_intr ;
harppie	verb ;
haukahellakseh	verb_refl ;
helpotella	verb_frekv ;
helppovuo	verb_transl ;
herkkoinnellakseh	verb_mod ;
herskuttoa	verb_deskr ;
hiivelöitteä	verb_mod ;
hirvistyö	verb_transl ;
hitšissä	verb_deskr ;
hivalkoittoa	verb_mod ;
hloimata	verb ;
hoahituttoa	verb_kaus ;
hohkahellakseh	verb_refl ;
hoijattoa	verb_fakt ;
houkastuo	verb_transl ;
huikaškoittoa	verb_mod ;
hukkoa	verb_deskr ;
hupsoilla	verb_frekv ;
huteroittuo	verb_transl ;
hyntšähteäkseh	verb_mom.-refl.mom ;
hyntteröitteä	verb_deskr ;
hypälteä	verb_mom ;
hyrskevyö	verb_inkoat ;
hyöhköinnelläkseh	verb_frekv.-refl ;
häkšätteä	verb_deskr ;
häkähytteä	verb_kaus ;
häplistyö	verb_pass ;
hätretä	verb_transl ;
höm(s)seä	verb_deskr ;
höpsähyö	verb_kontin ;
hötölteä	verb_deskr ;
iloillakseh	verb_refl ;
iravuttoa	verb ;
jes	verb_vaill ;
jeäksiksennellä	verb_frekv ;
jolkuttoa	verb_deskr ;
juhmevuo	verb_inkoat ;
juhmientoa	verb_kaus ;
juimistuo	verb_transl ;
juohtoa	verb_mod ;
jurskata	verb_tr ;
jutissa	verb_deskr ;
juumakoittuo	verb_transl ;
jyräköittyö	verb_transl ;
jäm(s)sähteäkseh	verb_mom.-refl.mom ;
jäsmäköittyö	verb_transl ;
jätysteä	verb_deskr ;
kaitristuo	verb_transl ;
kamppuijakseh	verb_refl ;
kannaltoa	verb_mom ;
kareta	verb_transl ;
karetellakseh	verb_frekv ;
karjeta	verb_transl ;
karkaittoa	verb_kaus ;
kasvoa	verb_intr ;
kataitšuttoa	verb_fakt ;
kauhistoa	verb ;
keimahuo	verb_kontin ;
kemottoa	verb_deskr ;
kesrä(v)ytteä	verb_fakt ;
kieristyö	verb_transl ;
kihkevyö	verb_inkoat ;
kiihissytellä	verb_frekv ;
kiikkuillakseh	verb_frekv.-refl ;
kiirehelläkseh	verb_refl ;
killistyö	verb_pass ;
kisailehtoa	verb_mod ;
kivissälteä	verb_mom ;
kĺunkututtoa	verb_yksipers ;
klökörteä	verb_deskr ;
koalattoa	verb_fakt ;
koateliettšie	verb_frekv.-refl ;
kokiella	verb_frekv ;
kolahtoakseh	verb_refl ;
konkelehtoa	verb ;
kopsahuo	verb_kontin ;
koreta	verb_transl ;
košahuttoa	verb_kaus ;
kotšahtoakseh	verb_mom.-refl.mom ;
kreäkkeä	verb_deskr ;
krihlevyö	verb_inkoat ;
kroapoinnellakseh	verb_frekv.-refl ;
kruklota	verb_transl ;
kulahuo	verb_kontin ;
kulakoijakseh	verb_refl ;
kuleltoa	verb_mom ;
kumahellakseh	verb_frekv ;
kumarruttoa	verb_fakt ;
kykissytteä	verb_fakt ;
kytšähteä	verb ;
kämähteäkseh	verb_refl ;
käyvä	verb_intr ;
köhevyö	verb_inkoat ;
köhötteä	verb_deskr ;
köklähteäkseh	verb_mom.-refl.mom ;
köllötellä	verb_frekv ;
köräitteä	verb_kaus ;
lannottautuo	verb_pass ;
laskettoakseh	verb_pass.refl ;
laskie	verb_tr ;
leikka(v)uttoa	verb_fakt ;
lepeälteä	verb_mom ;
lie	verb_vaill ;
liennä	verb_vaill ;
lie(nöy)	verb_vaill ;
lierottoa	verb_deskr ;
litšatakseh	verb_refl ;
livetteä	verb_yksipers ;
lokšahellakseh	verb_frekv.-refl ;
lokšahuo	verb_kontin ;
lopavuttoa	verb ;
lotkevuo	verb_inkoat ;
luimissutella	verb_frekv ;
luntuo	verb_pass ;
luotuttoa	verb_fakt ;
lutškahtoa	verb_mom ;
lykšähytteä	verb_kaus ;
lynkistyö	verb_pass.refl ;
lyvähteäkseh	verb_mom.-refl.mom ;
lävähelläkseh	verb_refl ;
lökšähyö	verb_kontin ;
maksottoa	verb_fakt ;
moata	verb_intr ;
muhahuttoa	verb_yksipers ;
muisteluttoa	verb_fakt ;
muńńertuo	verb_pass.refl ;
mutškentoakseh	verb_pass ;
muurittoa	verb ;
muutteliutuo	verb_pass.refl ;
mytkähteäkseh	verb_mom.-refl.mom ;
myörisselläkseh	verb_frekv.-refl ;
myötäillä	verb_frekv ;
mäklissytteä	verb_kaus ;
mänetytteä	verb_yksipers ;
nakrahuttoa	verb_yksipers ;
nakroa	verb_intr ;
ńaplahtoakseh	verb_mom ;
nihkaškata	verb_inkoat ;
nikahuttoa	verb_yksipers ;
nikluttoa	verb_kontin ;
nivovuo	verb_pass.refl ;
ńoakahtoakseh	verb_mom.-refl.mom ;
ńopittoa	verb_deskr ;
nossattoa	verb_fakt ;
nuorata	verb_yksipers ;
nälkäytyö	verb ;
näytteä	verb_tr ;
okoliekseh	verb_refl ;
oletuttoa	verb_yksipers ;
olkaillakseh	verb_frekv.-refl ;
oprautaijakseh	verb_pass.refl ;
otattoa	verb_fakt ;
pahkoittuo	verb_pass ;
painoa	verb_tr ;
paistoa	verb_intr ;
pakaistuo	verb_pass.yksipers ;
pakitšuttoa	verb_kaus ;
palvella	verb_tr ;
pamahellakseh	verb_frekv ;
pamahtoa	verb_mom ;
pauvahtoakseh	verb_pass.refl ;
pesetteä	verb_fakt.kaus ;
pilkkovuo	verb_pass ;
pimevyö	verb_inkoat ;
pisähteäkseh	verb_mom.-refl.mom ;
piuskuttoa	verb_kontin ;
pläkätäkseh	verb_pass.refl ;
plätšköinnelläkseh	verb_frekv.-refl ;
poapostie	verb ;
pomeni	verb_vaill ;
pomiilui	verb_vaill ;
pominoitšuttoa	verb_fakt ;
porotaltoa	verb_mom ;
poti	verb_vaill ;
potristoakseh	verb_refl ;
potsaloi	verb_vaill ;
potsalui	verb_vaill ;
prekahtoakseh	verb_mom.-refl.mom ;
prötškähteäkseh	verb_mom.-refl.mom ;
pröyšähytteä	verb_kaus ;
puistelehtoa	verb_kontin ;
punovuo	verb_pass.refl ;
purskahellakseh	verb_frekv ;
puurevuo	verb_inkoat ;
pälvevyö	verb_pass ;
pöllähteä	verb_mom ;
pöntšähteäkseh	verb_mom.-refl.mom ;
pöykeä	verb ;
raskuttoa	verb_yksipers ;
reuhkoinnellakseh	verb_frekv.-refl ;
reätšistyö	verb_pass.refl ;
reävytteä	verb_kaus ;
riittšiettšie	verb_refl ;
riivitteä	verb_fakt ;
roatškavuo	verb_inkoat ;
rokahtoa	verb_mom ;
rom(s)sahtoakseh	verb_mom.-refl.mom ;
rykšistyö	verb_pass ;
rytjytteä	verb_kontin ;
ryökähytteä	verb_yksipers ;
ryöppie	verb ;
räm(s)sisselläkseh	verb_frekv.-refl ;
rävähytellä	verb_frekv ;
räväissytteä	verb_kaus ;
römevyö	verb_inkoat ;
sakussiltoa	verb_mom ;
sattoakseh	verb_pass.refl ;
selittyö	verb_pass ;
siti	verb_vaill ;
šliepahuo	verb_kontin ;
šĺoimissuttoa	verb_yksipers ;
šĺunkahtoakseh	verb_mom.-refl.mom ;
šlänkevyö	verb_inkoat ;
snimaitšuttoa	verb_fakt ;
šoahkuttoa	verb_kontin ;
šoarrellakseh	verb_frekv.-refl ;
sohrani	verb_vaill ;
soivertoakseh	verb_refl ;
sorahtoa	verb_mom ;
sorikoija	verb ;
sotkevuo	verb_pass.refl ;
spuutiekseh	verb_pass ;
stopkahuttoa	verb_kaus ;
suijuttoa	verb_kontin ;
šulkutti	verb_vaill ;
šurnivuo	verb_inkoat ;
šurrutti	verb_vaill ;
syrvähteäkseh	verb_mom.-refl.mom ;
tahkovuttoa	verb_fakt ;
tarkitella	verb_frekv ;
tehostoakseh	verb_pass ;
tehtoinnellakseh	verb_frekv.-refl ;
toistuo	verb_pass.refl ;
tolšen	verb_vaill ;
tormasie	verb ;
tresnivyö	verb_inkoat ;
trihkuttoa	verb_kontin ;
tšerstauttoa	verb_yksipers ;
tšihahtoa	verb_mom ;
tšiirisselläkseh	verb_refl ;
tšiksahuttoa	verb_kaus ;
tšorhakoittuo	verb_pass ;
tšuilahuo	verb_kontin ;
tšuntšissellakseh	verb_frekv.-refl ;
tšuokahtoakseh	verb_mom.-refl.mom ;
tunkie	verb_tr ;
typpävyö	verb_pass ;
typätäkseh	verb_pass.refl ;
tyyräillä	verb_frekv ;
täpähteäkseh	verb_frekv.-refl ;
töhevyö	verb_inkoat ;
töksähteä	verb_mom ;
töläköitteä	verb_kaus ;
töyskytteä	verb_kontin ;
ukoittoa	verb_yksipers ;
umpoalla	verb ;
usvuo	verb_yksipers ;
vakaittuo	verb_pass ;
vassustuo	verb_pass.refl ;
vejätätteä	verb_fakt.kaus ;
veroitellakseh	verb_refl ;
vetrennelläkseh	verb_frekv.-refl ;
viitškahtoakseh	verb_mom.-refl.mom ;
vinkahtoa	verb_mom ;
virkautuo	verb_pass ;
virmevytteä	verb_kaus ;
vivoškata	verb_inkoat ;
voahtaillakseh	verb_frekv ;
vonkahellakseh	verb_frekv.-refl ;
vuitivuo	verb_pass.refl ;
vätvissytteä	verb_yksipers ;
yhötteä	verb ;
